Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 3 Tenancy in Common

34-3-1.
Tenancy in common presumed in conveyances.

All gifts, feoffments, grants, conveyances, devises or legacies, of real or personal estate, which shall be made to two (2) or more persons, whether they be husband and wife or otherwise, shall be deemed to create a tenancy in common and not a joint tenancy, unless it be declared that the tenancy is to be joint, or that the conveyance is to those persons and the survivors or survivor of them, or to them as trustees or executors, or unless the intention manifestly appears that the persons shall take as joint tenants and not as tenants in common.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 201, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 252, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 296, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 431, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-3-1

.

34-3-2.
Joint heirs.

Joint heirs shall be deemed tenants in common.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 201, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 252, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 296, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 431, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-3-2

.

34-3-3.
Proprietors of common and undivided lands.

Whereas, there is still remaining within several of the towns of this state, lands belonging to the original proprietors of the land, lying common or undivided, for the better government of the proprietors, the management of their prudential affairs, the more just and equal division of the lands and the allotments and preservation of the boundaries of the lands; it shall be lawful for the proprietors of the several towns within this state, being convened by warrant specifying the occasion for convening, under the hand and seal of a justice of the peace of the town, to choose a clerk, a surveyor or surveyors, and such other officers as they shall judge necessary for the orderly carrying on and management of their affairs, and in like manner to proceed from time to time as shall be necessary.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 190, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 55, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 56, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 341, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-3-3

.